North Carolina, session 2025, HB87.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 116-204 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-204. Powers of Authority.
The Authority is hereby authorized and empowered:
…
(14) To certify and submit a list of qualifying scholarship granting organizations
to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States in accordance with (i)
G.S. 116-209.111 and (ii) section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code (26
U.S.C. § 25F) and its associated regulations."
SECTION 2. Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new Part to read:
"Part 8. Compliance with Requirements of Federal Tax Credit for Contributions of Individuals
to Scholarship Granting Organizations.
"§ 116-209.110. State election for federal tax credit for contributions of individuals to
scholarship granting organizations.
Pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 2 of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution and
the provisions of G.S. 105-1.1 and in accordance with section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code
(26 U.S.C. § 25F), the General Assembly voluntarily elects the State of North Carolina to do the
following:
(1) Participate in the federal tax credit established under 26 U.S.C. § 25F for
individuals who make qualified contributions to scholarship granting
organizations.
(2) Identify scholarship granting organizations located in this State in accordance
with G.S. 116-209.111.
"§ 116-209.111. List of scholarship granting organizations.
(a) The Authority shall submit to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States and
publish on the website of the Authority a list of scholarship granting organizations that meet the
requirements of section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 25F) and are located in
this State. As part of the submission, the Authority shall certify its authority to submit the list on
behalf of the State and comply with any other requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 25F, its associated
regulations, or other applicable guidance issued by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United
States.
(b) The Authority may establish rules governing the process and documentation
necessary for an entity to qualify to be included as a scholarship granting organization on the list
*H87-v-7*

produced and submitted by the Authority pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and in
accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 25F, its associated regulations, or other applicable guidance issued
by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States.
(c) The Authority may enter into an agreement with other State agencies, including the
Department of Revenue, to meet the requirements of this section."
SECTION 3. The State Education Assistance Authority shall comply with all federal
regulations pertaining to the administration of the federal tax credit established under 26 U.S.C.
§ 25F to ensure that the State is eligible to participate in taxable years beginning after December
31, 2026. The State Education Assistance Authority shall establish any necessary rules by July
1, 2026, or within 120 days of the publication of federal regulations, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. In accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 25F and any applicable federal
regulation and guidance, qualifying scholarship granting organizations on the list produced
pursuant to G.S. 116-204(14), as enacted by this act, may provide scholarships for any qualified
elementary or secondary education expense, including home school expenses, to the extent
allowed under federal law.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 31st day of July, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Allen Chesser
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
VETO Josh Stein
Governor
Became law notwithstanding the objections of the Governor at 4:26 p.m. this 3rd day
of June, 2026.
s/ Ms. Sarah Holland
Senate Principal Clerk
Page 2 Session Law 2026-6 House Bill 87